Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 13A-106, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 13A-106. A. To be eligible to be a candidate for
member of the board of education of a school district or technology
center school district, a person must have resided in the district
or, if the board seat is in an independent district, have resided in
that district for at least six (6) months preceding the first day of
the filing period, and have been a registered voter registered with
the county election board at an address located within the
geographical boundaries of the district for six (6) months preceding
Req. No. 12681 Page 1

the first day of the filing period. Beginning May 1, 1990, no
person shall be eligible to be a candidate for or elected to be a
member of the board of education of a school district or technology
center school district unless the person has been awarded a high
school diploma or certificate of high school equivalency. In school
districts that are divided into election districts, a candidate must
have resided in the district for at least six (6) months preceding
the first day of the filing period and have been a registered voter
registered with the county election board at an address located
within the geographical boundaries of the election district for six
(6) months preceding the first day of the filing period. Beginning
May 1, 1990, no person shall be eligible to be a candidate for or
elected to be a member of the board of education unless the person
has been awarded a high school diploma or certificate of high school
equivalency.
B. Any person who was previously employed by a school district
and whose employment was terminated for cause by the school district
shall not be an eligible candidate for member of the board of
education of the school district in which the person's employment
was terminated for cause.
C. To be eligible to vote in a school district election or a
technology center school district election, a person must be
registered with the county election board at an address located
within the geographical boundaries of the district. To be eligible
Req. No. 12681 Page 2

to v ote in an election district election within a school district, a
person must be registered with the county election board at an
address located within the geographical boundaries of the election
district.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12681 SW 02/14/25

















Req. No. 12681 Page 3